dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.aff
SFX F Y 64
SFX F 0 a [nbclrdmn] is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 as [nbclrdmn] is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F 0 a [^u][t] is:fem is:sg 
SFX F 0 as [^u][t] is:fem is:pl 
SFX F 0 a ant is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 as ant is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F 0 a ent is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 as ent is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F 0 sa òs is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 sas òs is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F ós osa ós is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F ós osas ós is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F 0 a òt is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 as òt is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F it ida it is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F it idas it is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F 0 a i is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 as i is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F e a e is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F e as e is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F 0 sa [e]s is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 sas [e]s is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F ís issa ís is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F ís issas ís is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F tge tja tge is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F tge tjas tge is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F ag aja ag is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F ag ajas ag is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F és esa és is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F és esas és is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F ut uda [u]t is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F ut udas [u]t is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F as assa as is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F as assas as is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F às assa às is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F às assas às is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F at ada [a]t is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F at adas [a]t is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F iu iva iu is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F iu ivas iu is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F ívol ivola ívol is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F ívol ivolas ívol is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F e a aire is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F e as aire is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F 0 a enc is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 as enc is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F nh nha nh is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F nh nhas nh is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F dor doira ador is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F dor doiras ador is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F aire aira aire is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F aire airas aire is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F eire eira eire is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F eire eiras eire is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F 0 a ièch is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F 0 as ièch is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F c ga uc is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F c gas uc is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F ge ja ge is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F ge jas ge is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F u va au is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F u vas au is:fem is:pl di:*
SFX F lòg lòga lòg is:fem is:sg di:*
SFX F lòg lògas lòg is:fem is:pl di:*

SFX g Y 94
SFX g çar ci [ç]ar di:*
SFX g ar ui [g]ar di:*
SFX g car qui [c]ar di:*
SFX g jar gi [j]ar di:*
SFX g ar as [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar a [gcçj]ar is:3pers is:sing
SFX g ar am [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar atz [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar an [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar avi [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar ava [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar avas [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar àvem [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar àvetz [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g ar avan [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g car quèri [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quères [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèt [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèc [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèrem [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèretz [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèron [c]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèri [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cères [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèt [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèc [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèrem [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèretz [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèron [ç]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèri [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gères [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèt [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèc [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèrem [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèretz [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèron [j]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèri [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uères [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèt [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèrem [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèretz [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèron [g]ar di:*
SFX g 0 ai [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 às [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 à [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 em [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 etz [gçcj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 àn [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 iái [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 iás [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 iá [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 iam [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 iatz [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g 0 ián [gcçj]ar di:*
SFX g car que [c]ar di:*
SFX g car ques [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quem [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quetz [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quen [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèsse [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèsses [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèssem [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèssetz [c]ar di:*
SFX g car quèsson [c]ar di:*
SFX g jar ge [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar ges [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gem [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar getz [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gen [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèsse [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèsses [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèssem [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèssetz [j]ar di:*
SFX g jar gèsson [j]ar di:*
SFX g ar ue [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar ues [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uem [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uetz [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uen [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèsse [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèsses [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèssem [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèssetz [g]ar di:*
SFX g ar uèsson [g]ar di:*
SFX g çar ce [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar ces [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cem [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cetz [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cen [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèsse [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèsses [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèssem [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèssetz [ç]ar di:*
SFX g çar cèsson [ç]ar di:*

#SFX h. Y 2
#SFX h. ar ada ar is:ppas genre:fem is:sing
#SFX h. ar adas ar is:ppas genre:fem is:plu

SFX h Y 30
SFX h at ada at  
SFX h at adas at di:*
SFX h 0 s at di:*
SFX h at ant at di:*
SFX h ar ant ar di:*
SFX h ar at ar 
SFX h ar ats ar 
SFX h it ida it di:*
SFX h it idas it di:*
SFX h it issent it di:*
SFX h 0 s it di:*
SFX h ir ida ir  is:ppas genre:fem is:sing di:*
SFX h ir idas ir is:ppas genre:fem is:plu di:*
SFX h ir issent ir di:*
SFX h ir it ir di:*
SFX h ir its ir di:*
SFX h ut uts ut di:*
SFX h ut uda ut di:*
SFX h ut udas ut di:*
SFX h ut ent ut di:*
SFX h ït ida ït di:*
SFX h ït ïssent ït di:*
SFX h re ent re di:*
SFX h ure vent iure di:*
SFX h ire sent [aeu]ire di:*
SFX h re sent [rdf]ire di:*
SFX h re sent ure di:*
SFX h er ent er di:*
SFX h e ent ne di:*
SFX h és esa és di:*

SFX i Y 45
SFX i r ssi [iï]r di:*
SFX i r sses [iï]r di:*
SFX i ir ís [i]r di:*
SFX i ïr ís [ï]r di:*
SFX i ir ís [ui]r di:*
SFX i r ssèm [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ssètz [iï]r di:*
SFX i r sson [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ssen [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ssiái [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ssiá [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ssiás [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ssiam [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ssiatz [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ssián [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèri [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guères [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèt [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèc [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèrem [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèretz [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèron [iï]r di:*
SFX i r rai [iï]r di:*
SFX i r rèi [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ràs [iï]r di:*
SFX i r rà [iï]r di:*
SFX i r rem [iï]r di:*
SFX i r retz [iï]r di:*
SFX i r ràn [iï]r di:*
SFX i r riái [iï]r di:*
SFX i r riás [iï]r di:*
SFX i r riá [iï]r di:*
SFX i r riam [iï]r di:*
SFX i r riatz [iï]r di:*
SFX i r rián [iï]r di:*
SFX i r sca [iï]r di:*
SFX i r scas [iï]r di:*
SFX i r scam [iï]r di:*
SFX i r scatz [iï]r di:*
SFX i r scan [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèsse [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèsses [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèssem [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèssetz [iï]r di:*
SFX i r guèsson [iï]r di:*

SFX j Y 40
SFX j r 0 ir di:*
SFX j ir es ir di:*
SFX j ir 0 ir di:*
SFX j ir èm ir di:*
SFX j ir ètz ir di:*
SFX j ir on ir di:*
SFX j ir iái ir di:*
SFX j ir iás ir di:*
SFX j ir iá ir di:*
SFX j ir iam ir di:*
SFX j ir iatz ir di:*
SFX j ir ián ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèri ir di:*
SFX j ir iguères ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèt ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèrem ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèretz ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèron ir di:*
SFX j 0 ai ir di:*
SFX j 0 às ir di:*
SFX j 0 à ir di:*
SFX j 0 em ir di:*
SFX j ir etz ir di:*
SFX j ir àn ir di:*
SFX j ir a ir di:*
SFX j ir as ir di:*
SFX j ir am ir di:*
SFX j ir atz ir di:*
SFX j ir an ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèsse ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèsses ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèssem ir di:*
SFX j ir iguessetz ir di:*
SFX j ir iguèsson ir di:*
SFX j 0 iái ir di:*
SFX j 0 iás ir di:*
SFX j 0 iá ir di:*
SFX j 0 iam ir di:*
SFX j ir iatz ir di:*
SFX j ir ián ir di:*

PFX l N 2
PFX l 0 l' [aeéèiouUàáóòíìúùh] di:*
PFX l 0 l' [AEIOUÀÍÌÈÉÒÓÚ] di:*

PFX L Y 2
PFX L 0 l' [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh] di:*
PFX L 0 l' [AEIOUÀÍÌÈÉÒÓÚ] di:*

PFX M Y 1
PFX M 0 m' [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh] di:*

PFX N Y 1
PFX N 0 n' [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh] di:*

SFX p Y 5
SFX p r t r di:*
SFX p r da r di:*
SFX p r ts r di:*
SFX p r das r di:*
SFX p r nt r di:*

PFX Q Y 2
PFX Q 0 qu' [aeéèiouàáóòíìúùh] di:*
PFX Q 0 qu' [AEIOUÀÍÌÈÉÒÓÚ] di:*
