dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.dic
acantèli/MTLQNc	di:*	id:770
acantelir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:771
acarnar/SMTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:819
acaselir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:846
acoquinar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:1160
adiguèri/MTLQNw	po:v3	di:*	id:1439
adiposa/slD	di:*	id:58076
adirai/MTLQNx	di:*	id:1440
adocir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:1483
afermir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:1754
afrontat/h	di:*	id:2037
agautar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:2169
aglabir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:2213
aglandar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:2221
agrir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:2420
albanesa/slD	po:nom	po:adj	is:fem	ts:gent	di:*	id:2953
aletrar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:3128
aleugieirar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:3139
alieitar/MTLQNaS	po:v1	ts:merid	di:*	id:65432
alpèstre/slDQ	po:adj	is:mas	di:*	id:89737
amolegar/MTLQNg	di:*	id:3843
amortieirèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:3933
amortisar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:3941
amotir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:3961
anchòia/slD	di:*	id:4069
Antananarivo/DQl	po:pr.place.n.	di:*	id:67375
apaïsanit/h	di:*	id:4427
apilaire/slD	di:*	id:4720
apilotar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:4734
apiscar/MTLQNg	di:*	id:4749
aplanar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:4772
arabofòna/slDQ	po:adj	is:fem	ip:ling	di:*	id:59031
armassir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:5395
arrossegador/slD	di:*	id:59147
assedar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:6134
ataular/MTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:74768
atemporir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:6527
ateunhir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:6619
atrachat/h	di:*	id:6730
Auribat/DQl	po:pr.place.n.	di:*	id:67607
Aussona/DQl	po:pr.place.n.	di:*	id:67640
bachacar/gh	di:*	id:7575
blesejar/gh	di:*	id:9301
bochonar/ah	di:*	id:9434
boiradís/sF	di:*	id:9536
butir/ih	di:*	id:10954
cabussejar/gh	di:*	id:11164
carnavalesc/sF	po:adj	di:*	id:65402
clapassejar/gh	di:*	id:13358
complotar/bh	di:*	id:14263
conscienciós/sF	po:adj	di:*	id:14665
consentir/jh	di:*	id:14689
constituir/ih	po:v2	di:*	id:14747
decar/gh	di:*	id:16788
descrusar/ah	di:*	id:18205
desgarambir/ih	di:*	id:18692
desgradable/sF	di:*	id:18774
ebissoat/h	di:*	id:20715
elevacion/slD	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:66142
embarbolhar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:21163
embiaçar/MTLQNg	di:*	id:21358
embocetz/MTLQN	di:*	id:21401
embodelèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:21407
embodòssi/MTLQNc	di:*	id:21417
empunaisir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:22274
encauçanar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:22589
encavalar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:22603
encavalcar/MTLQNg	di:*	id:22605
enfadir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:23283
engatjar/SDMTLQNg	po:v1	di:*	id:23797
engaugilhar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:23813
enguiala/slD	di:*	id:24109
enjaurat/h	di:*	id:24139
entestesir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:24843
entranugar/MTLQNg	di:*	id:24963
entrapèli/MTLQNc	di:*	id:24972
entrar/MTLQNah	po:v1	di:*	id:24973
entressentir/MTLQNj	di:*	id:25215
eqüilateral/slDQ	po:adj	is:mas	di:*	id:77642
escaudalha/slD	di:*	id:26441
esclatir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:26596
esclauguèri/MTLQNw	di:*	id:26603
esclausiái/MTLQNv	di:*	id:26607
espelugar/MTLQNg	po:v1	di:*	id:27775
espertar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:27903
espertèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:27905
espèrti/MTLQNc	po:v1	di:*	id:27908
espessugar/MTLQNg	di:*	id:27949
espòrla/slD	di:*	id:28276
estopir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:29100
estrabrasat/h	di:*	id:29174
Eusèbi/lDQ	po:pr.m	po:prn	is:mas	di:*	id:57558
exclusiái/MTLQNv	po:v3	di:*	id:29718
excomunièri/MTLQNd	po:v1	di:*	id:29721
excomúnii/MTLQNc	di:*	id:29722
extingibla/slDQ	po:adj	is:fem	di:*	id:88119
feble/sF	di:*	id:30419
gargotejar/gh	di:*	id:32685
garrut/sF	po:adj	di:*	id:64753
immatriculat/h	po:v1	di:*	id:34472
inchalhenta/slD	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:77263
ionosfèra/slD	po:nom	is:fem	ip:astron	ip:bio	ip:meteo	di:*	id:63767
irreverenciós/slDQ	po:adj	is:mas	di:*	id:86204
itinerant/sFDQl	po:adj	di:*	id:35418
malzir/ih	di:*	id:37403
marroquinièr/sF	po:nom	di:*	id:73923
moflejar/gh	di:*	id:38921
neuroscientific/sF	po:adj	di:*	id:89010
òrdre/slDQ	po:nom	is:mas	di:*	id:40864
oscultat/h	di:*	id:41067
pentir/jh	di:*	id:42673
petardejar/gh	di:*	id:43106
pimet/sF	di:*	id:43347
quinaud/sF	di:*	id:45526
reapropriar/bh	po:v1	di:*	id:89522
reconstituir/ih	di:*	id:46890
replegar/gh	di:*	id:48050
salvadorenc/sF	di:*	id:50359
sangbarrejar/gh	po:v1	di:*	id:90013
sanglotir/ih	di:*	id:50442
sentir/jh	po:v2	di:*	id:51100
sovenir/jh	po:pron.v.	po:v3	di:*	id:52143
subreauçar/gh	po:v1	di:*	id:78531
tastigol/sF	di:*	id:52971
trissar/ah	po:v1	di:*	id:54930
vecièr/sF	po:nom	di:*	id:60969
vonvonejar/gh	po:v1	di:*	id:56480
